Hawaii statutes.
§442-17 Licensees, duties.
Chiropractic licensees shall observe and be subject to all state and municipal
regulations relating to all matters pertaining to public health and may execute
disability and health certificates so long as the same are confined to physical
conditions and ailments which they are by law authorized to treat, which
certificates shall be accepted by all officials, authorities, and boards
operating within the State who are officially concerned with the matters or
subject covered by the certificates. [L 1925, c 99, §12; RL 1935, §970; am L
1939, c 186, §2; RL 1945, §2081; RL 1955, §60-12; HRS §442-17; am L 1982, c
112, §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next